Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Public Utility Commission shall  establish a public process for the
purpose of investigating how developing industry trends,  technologies and policy drivers in
the electricity sector might impact  the existing regulatory system and incentives currently
employed by the commission. If warranted, the  commission may consider changes to the
existing regulatory system and incentives.
(2) As part of the public process established under  subsection (1) of this section, the
commission shall investigate the following:
(a) The obligations of and benefits to electric companies under the  existing regulatory
system;
(b) The obligations of and benefits to customers of electric  companies under the existing
regulatory system, including customers that participate in direct access;
(c) The current use of regulatory incentives, including but limited to:
(A) Incentives for electric companies to place  capital investment in rate base, paying
particular attention to the perception of bias in resource selection;
(B) Incentives for electric companies to plan for  serving all existing and all new elec-
tricity loads in electric companies’ service territories; and
(C) Incentives for electric companies and for customers of electric companies to develop
renewable energy resources and purchase renewable energy; and
(d) The  primary public policy objectives that are promoted by the commission’s current
statutory authority and by the existing regulatory system and incentives.
(3) As part of the public process  established under subsection (1) of this section, the
commission shall identify industry trends, technologies  and policy drivers currently devel-
oping in the electricity industry, including but not limited to:
(a) Greater penetration by variable energy resources of electric utilities’ electrical sys-
tems;
(b) Increasing presence and cost-effectiveness of distributed energy resources in  electric
utilities’ electrical systems;
(c) Greater customer support sophistication and desire for energy service  options and
energy management tools;
(d) Increasing customer desire for energy service needs to be  met by a specific generat-
ing resource through either  nonutility owned resources and delivery options or utility owned
resources and delivery options;
Enrolled Senate Bill 978 (SB 978-B) Page 1
(e) Greater recognition of the carbon output of electricity generation;
(f) The electrification of the transportation sector;
(g) The potential for regional transmission markets;
(h) Advances in distribution system communication and control technologies;
(i) The need to replace aging distribution system equipment for grid modernization;
(j) Use of performance-based incentives used  by other states in addressing the industry
trends, technologies and policy drivers described in this subsection; and
(k) Changes in public policy objectives that are developing in relation  to the electricity
sector or that have directly or indirectly been identified by the Legislative Assembly.
(4) The commission shall explore changes to the  existing regulatory system and incen-
tives that could accommodate developing industry trends  and support new policy objectives
without compromising affordable rates, safety and reliable service. If the commission deter-
mines that changes to the existing regulatory system and incentives would be in  the interest
of customers of electric companies and the public generally, the commission shall  develop
plans to administratively implement changes to the regulatory system and incentives or shall
make recommendations to the  Legislative Assembly for the purpose of legislatively imple-
menting changes to the regulatory system and incentives.
(5) As part of the public process  established under subsection (1) of this section, the
commission shall provide the public with an opportunity to comment.
(6) The commission shall  submit a report on the findings of the public process established
under subsection (1) of this  section and the progress of investigations conducted under sub-
section (2) of this section in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim  committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to  energy and business no later than September 15, 2018.
The commission may include, as part of the commission’s  report, recommendations for leg-
islation.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2019.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the limit on expendi-
tures established by section 1 (1), chapter 93, Oregon Laws 2017  (Enrolled House Bill 5035),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Public Utility Commission, is increased
by $166,400 for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2017 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 978 (SB 978-B) Page 2
Passed by Senate July 3, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 978 (SB 978-B) Page 3